test/tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/CmpN-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Default tests: # Default in SMA is SgNom and SgGen
    båaloe+N+Cmp#raejkie+N+Sg+Nom: [båaloeraejkie, båaloenraejkie, ~båaloejraejkie]
    leevege+N+Cmp#gåetie+N+Sg+Nom: [leevehgåetie, ~leevegegåetie, leevegengåetie, ~leevegigåetie]   

# CmpN/SgNom tests:
  CmpN/SgN tests:
    vuelie+N+Cmp#gåetie+N+Sg+Nom: [vueliegåetie, ~vueliengåetie, ~vueliejgåetie, ~vööligåetie]   
      
# CmpN/SgGen tests: # No cases in the lexicon with only CmpN/SgGen
  CmpN/SgG tests:
    fraanske+A+Attr+Cmp#gïele+N+Sg+Nom: [fraanskegïele, ~fraanskgïele]

# CmpN/PlGen tests: # No cases in the lexicon with only CmpN/PlGen
#  CmpN/PlG tests:
#    gööth+N+Cmp#jerkie+N+Sg+Nom: [gööthjerkie, gåetiejerkie, ~gåetienjerkie]

# CmpN/SgNom + CmpN/SgGen tests:
# This is the default - no such cases found in the lexicon.

# CmpN/SgGen + CmpN/PlGen tests:
  CmpN/SgGen + CmpN/PlGen tests:
    gelliengïele+N+Cmp#jerkie+N+Sg+Nom: [~gelliengïelejerkie, gelliengïelenjerkie, gelliengïelijerkie]

# CmpN/SgNom + CmpN/SgGen + CmpN/PlGen tests:
  CmpN/SgN + SgG + PlG tests:
# gïele+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gïel NIEJTE ;
    gïele+N+Cmp#mïele+N+Sg+Nom: [gïelemïele, ~gïelenmïele, ~gïelimïele]           # gïele  - all three forms, mïele - default
# gåetie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gået N_IE ;
    gåetie+N+Cmp#luhpie+N+Sg+Nom: [gåetieluhpie, ~gåetienluhpie, ~gåetiejluhpie]  # gåetie - all three forms, luhpie - default
    gåetie+N+Cmp#tsegkie+N+Sg+Nom: [gåetietsegkie, gåetientsegkie, ~gåetiejtsegkie] # tsegkie - default
# slïekte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:slïekt NIEJTE ;
    slïekte+N+Cmp#boelve+N+Sg+Nom: [slïekteboelve, ~slïektenboelve, ~slïektiboelve] #slïekte - all three, boelve: all three, no Left

#  CmpN/SgNomLeft tests:
  CmpN/SgNomLeft tests:
# åemie - FirstComponent ONLY, aehtjie - no Left tag
#    åemie+N+Cmp#aehtjie+N+Sg+Nom: [åemieaehtjie, ~åemienaehtjie, ~åemiejaehtjie] #aehtjie: +CmpN/SgNomLeft
    gåetie+N+Cmp#almetjh+N+Pl+Nom: [gåetiealmetjh, gåetienalmetjh, ~gåetiejalmetjh]
    
#  CmpN/SgGenLeft tests: # there are no entries in the lexicon with only SgGenLeft

#  CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
#    spaanske+N+Cmp#gasska+N+Sg+Nom: [spaanskegïele, ~spaanskengïele, ~spaanskigïele]

#  CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
  CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
    gïele+N+Cmp#gaske+N+Sg+Nom: [gïelegaske, ~gïelengaske, gïeligaske] # gïele - all three, gaske: CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft . 

#  All three Left tests:
  CmpN/SgNomLeft SgGenLeft PlGenLeft tests:
    båaloe+N+Cmp#aalkoe+N+Sg+Nom: [båaloeaalkoe, båaloeaalkove, ~båaloenaalkoe, ~båaloenaalkove, ~båaloejaalkoe, ~båaloejaalkove] # båaloe - default, aalkoe: all three Left
    vuelie+N+Cmp#raedtie+N+Sg+Nom: [vuelieraedtie,~vuelienraedtie, ~vueliejraedtie, ~vööliraedtie] # vuelie - SgNom, raedtie: all three Left

#  CmpN/DefSgGen tests:
#
#  CmpN/DefPlGen tests:
   
